Utah statutes.
26-33a-105.   Executive secretary -- Appointment -- Powers.

(1)  An executive secretary shall be appointed by the executive director, with the approval of the committee, and shall serve under the administrative direction of the executive director.

(2)  The executive secretary shall:

(a)  employ full-time employees necessary to carry out this chapter;

(b)  supervise the development of a draft health data plan for the committee's review, modification, and approval; and

(c)  supervise and conduct the staff functions of the committee in order to assist the committee in meeting its responsibilities under this chapter.

